Washington statutes.
RCW 15.130.560

Criminal penalties.

(1) A person who knowingly violates RCW 15.130.200 through 15.130.240, 15.130.500, 15.130.520, or 15.130.540 is guilty of a misdemeanor subject to a penalty of not more than two hundred dollars.

(2) A person who knowingly violates RCW 15.130.200 through 15.130.240, 15.130.500, 15.130.520, or 15.130.540 following a first offense under subsection (1) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor subject to a penalty of imprisonment for not more than thirty days or a fine of not more than five hundred dollars, or both.

(3) A person who knowingly violates RCW 15.130.200 through 15.130.240, 15.130.500, 15.130.520, or 15.130.540 with intent to defraud or mislead is guilty of a misdemeanor subject to a penalty of imprisonment for not more than ninety days or a fine of not more than one thousand dollars, or both.

(4) Before reporting a violation for criminal prosecution, the department must provide the affected person with notice and opportunity to present oral or written comment to the department.

[ 2018 c 236 s 507.]